Nevada, session 83, AB410.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 200.471 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.471 1. As used in this section:
(a) “Assault” means:
(1) Unlawfully attempting to use physical force against
another person; or
(2) Intentionally placing another person in reasonable
apprehension of immediate bodily harm [.] , including, without
limitation, making a threat of sexual violence against another
person. As used in this subparagraph, “threat of sexual violence”
means an oral or written threat to commit a sexual offense, as
defined in NRS 179D.097, against another person.
-
*AB410*

– 2 –
(b) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239B.020.
(c) “Health care facility” means a facility licensed pursuant to
chapter 449 of NRS, an office of a person listed in NRS 629.031, a
clinic or any other location, other than a residence, where health
care is provided.
(d) “Officer” means:
(1) A person who possesses some or all of the powers of a
peace officer;
(2) A person employed in a full-time salaried occupation of
fire fighting for the benefit or safety of the public;
(3) A member of a volunteer fire department;
(4) A jailer, guard or other correctional officer of a city or
county jail;
(5) A prosecuting attorney of an agency or political
subdivision of the United States or of this State;
(6) A justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of
Appeals, district judge, justice of the peace, municipal judge,
magistrate, court commissioner, master or referee, including a
person acting pro tempore in a capacity listed in this subparagraph;
(7) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State whose official duties require the employee to make home
visits;
(8) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a law enforcement
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to law enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the law enforcement agency;
(9) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a fire-fighting
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to fire fighting or fire
prevention; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the fire-fighting agency; or
(10) A civilian employee or volunteer of this State or a
political subdivision of this State whose official duties require the
employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to code enforcement; and
-
*AB410*

– 3 –
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
this State or a political subdivision of this State.
(e) “Provider of health care” means:
(1) A physician, a medical student, a perfusionist, an
anesthesiologist assistant or a physician assistant licensed pursuant
to chapter 630 of NRS, a practitioner of respiratory care, a
homeopathic physician, an advanced practitioner of homeopathy, a
homeopathic assistant, an osteopathic physician, a physician
assistant or anesthesiologist assistant licensed pursuant to chapter
633 of NRS, a podiatric physician, a podiatry hygienist, a physical
therapist, a medical laboratory technician, an optometrist, a
chiropractic physician, a chiropractic assistant, a naprapath, a doctor
of Oriental medicine, a nurse, a student nurse, a certified nursing
assistant, a nursing assistant trainee, a medication aide - certified, a
person who provides health care services in the home for
compensation, a dentist, a dental student, a dental hygienist, a dental
hygienist student, an expanded function dental assistant, an
expanded function dental assistant student, a pharmacist, a
pharmacy student, an intern pharmacist, an attendant on an
ambulance or air ambulance, a psychologist, a social worker, a
marriage and family therapist, a marriage and family therapist
intern, a clinical professional counselor, a clinical professional
counselor intern, a behavior analyst, an assistant behavior analyst, a
registered behavior technician, a mental health technician, a licensed
dietitian, the holder of a license or a limited license issued under the
provisions of chapter 653 of NRS, a public safety officer at a health
care facility, an emergency medical technician, an advanced
emergency medical technician, a paramedic or a participant in a
program of training to provide emergency medical services; or
(2) An employee of or volunteer for a health care facility
who:
(I) Interacts with the public;
(II) Performs tasks related to providing health care; and
(III) Wears identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the person as an employee or volunteer of the health care
facility.
(f) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed person
employed by a board of trustees of a school district pursuant to NRS
391.100 or 391.281.
(g) “Sporting event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
(h) “Sports official” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
(i) “Taxicab” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 706.8816.
-
*AB410*

– 4 –
(j) “Taxicab driver” means a person who operates a taxicab.
(k) “Transit operator” means a person who operates a bus or
other vehicle as part of a public mass transportation system.
(l) “Utility worker” means an employee of a public utility as
defined in NRS 704.020 whose official duties require the employee
to:
(1) Interact with the public;
(2) Perform tasks related to the operation of the public
utility; and
(3) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that identifies
the employee as working for the public utility.
2. A person convicted of an assault shall be punished:
(a) If paragraph (c) or (d) does not apply to the circumstances of
the crime and the assault is not made with the use of a deadly
weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a
misdemeanor.
(b) If the assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the
present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
(c) If paragraph (d) does not apply to the circumstances of the
crime and if the assault:
(1) Is committed upon:
(I) An officer, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a
transit operator or a utility worker who is performing his or her
duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, a provider of health care, a school employee,
a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a utility worker or a sports
official,
 for a gross misdemeanor, unless the assault is made with the use
of a deadly weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon,
then for a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years, or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by both
fine and imprisonment.
(d) If the assault:
(1) Is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who is in
lawful custody or confinement or a parolee upon:
-
*AB410*

– 5 –
(I) An officer, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a
transit operator or a utility worker who is performing his or her
duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The probationer, prisoner or parolee charged knew or
should have known that the victim was an officer, a provider of
health care, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a
utility worker or a sports official,
 for a category D felony as provided in NRS 193.130, unless the
assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the present
ability to use a deadly weapon, then for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
H
-
*AB410*